st.aff
FLAG long
SFX dA Y 42
SFX dA peler peler/ peler # po:infi
SFX dA peler pelant/ peler # po:ppre
SFX dA peler pelé/ peler # po:ppas po:adj po:1jsg is:mas is:sg
SFX dA peler pelés/ peler # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX dA peler pelée/ peler # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX dA peler pelées/ peler # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX dA peler pelle/ peler # po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX dA peler pelles/ peler # po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX dA peler pelons/ peler # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX dA peler pelez/ peler # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX dA peler pellent/ peler # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX dA peler pelais/ peler # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX dA peler pelait/ peler # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX dA peler pelions/ peler # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX dA peler peliez/ peler # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX dA peler pelaient/ peler # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX dA peler pelai/ peler # po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX dA peler pelas/ peler # po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX dA peler pela/ peler # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX dA peler pelâmes/ peler # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX dA peler pelâtes/ peler # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX dA peler pelèrent/ peler # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX dA peler pellerai/ peler # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX dA peler pelleras/ peler # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX dA peler pellera/ peler # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX dA peler pellerons/ peler # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX dA peler pellerez/ peler # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX dA peler pelleront/ peler # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX dA peler pellerais/ peler # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX dA peler pellerait/ peler # po:cond po:3sg
SFX dA peler pellerions/ peler # po:cond po:1pl
SFX dA peler pelleriez/ peler # po:cond po:2pl
SFX dA peler pelleraient/ peler # po:cond po:3pl
SFX dA peler pelasse/ peler # po:simp po:1sg
SFX dA peler pelasses/ peler # po:simp po:2sg
SFX dA peler pelât/ peler # po:simp po:3sg
SFX dA peler pelassions/ peler # po:simp po:1pl
SFX dA peler pelassiez/ peler # po:simp po:2pl
SFX dA peler pelassent/ peler # po:simp po:3pl
SFX dA peler pelle/ peler # po:impe po:2sg
SFX dA peler pelons/ peler # po:impe po:1pl
SFX dA peler pelez/ peler # po:impe po:2pl

SFX f0 Y 33
SFX f0 ir ir/ ir # po:infi
SFX f0 ir issant/ ir # po:ppre
SFX f0 ir is/ ir # po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX f0 ir it/ ir # po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX f0 ir issons/ ir # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX f0 ir issez/ ir # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX f0 ir issent/ ir # po:ipre po:spre po:simp po:3pl
SFX f0 ir issais/ ir # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX f0 ir issait/ ir # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX f0 ir issions/ ir # po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:1pl
SFX f0 ir issiez/ ir # po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:2pl
SFX f0 ir issaient/ ir # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX f0 ir îmes/ ir # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX f0 ir îtes/ ir # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX f0 ir irent/ ir # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX f0 ir irai/ ir # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX f0 ir iras/ ir # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX f0 ir ira/ ir # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX f0 ir irons/ ir # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX f0 ir irez/ ir # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX f0 ir iront/ ir # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX f0 ir irais/ ir # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX f0 ir irait/ ir # po:cond po:3sg
SFX f0 ir irions/ ir # po:cond po:1pl
SFX f0 ir iriez/ ir # po:cond po:2pl
SFX f0 ir iraient/ ir # po:cond po:3pl
SFX f0 ir isse/ ir # po:spre po:simp po:1sg
SFX f0 ir isses/ ir # po:spre po:simp po:2sg
SFX f0 ir isse/ ir # po:spre po:3sg
SFX f0 ir ît/ ir # po:simp po:3sg
SFX f0 ir is/ ir # po:impe po:2sg
SFX f0 ir issons/ ir # po:impe po:1pl
SFX f0 ir issez/ ir # po:impe po:2pl

SFX fA Y 38
SFX fA aïr aïr/ aïr # po:infi
SFX fA aïr aïssant/ aïr # po:ppre
SFX fA aïr aï/ aïr # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX fA aïr aïs/ aïr # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX fA aïr aïe/ aïr # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX fA aïr aïes/ aïr # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX fA aïr ais/ aïr # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fA aïr ait/ aïr # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïssons/ aïr # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssez/ aïr # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïssent/ aïr # po:ipre po:spre po:simp po:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïssais/ aïr # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïssait/ aïr # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïssions/ aïr # po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssiez/ aïr # po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïssaient/ aïr # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïs/ aïr # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aït/ aïr # po:ipsi po:simp po:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïmes/ aïr # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïtes/ aïr # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïrent/ aïr # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX fA aïr aïrai/ aïr # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX fA aïr aïras/ aïr # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïra/ aïr # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïrons/ aïr # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïrez/ aïr # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïront/ aïr # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX fA aïr aïrais/ aïr # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïrait/ aïr # po:cond po:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïrions/ aïr # po:cond po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïriez/ aïr # po:cond po:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïraient/ aïr # po:cond po:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïsse/ aïr # po:spre po:simp po:1sg
SFX fA aïr aïsses/ aïr # po:spre po:simp po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïsse/ aïr # po:spre po:3sg
SFX fA aïr ais/ aïr # po:impe po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïssons/ aïr # po:impe po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssez/ aïr # po:impe po:2pl

SFX fB Y 29
SFX fB haïr haïr/ aïr # po:infi
SFX fB haïr haïssant/ aïr # po:ppre
SFX fB haïr haï/ aïr # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX fB haïr haïs/ aïr # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX fB haïr haïe/ aïr # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX fB haïr haïes/ aïr # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX fB haïr hait/ aïr # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïssons/ aïr # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssez/ aïr # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïssent/ aïr # po:ipre po:spre po:simp po:3pl
SFX fB haïr haïssait/ aïr # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïssions/ aïr # po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssiez/ aïr # po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïssaient/ aïr # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX fB haïr haït/ aïr # po:ipsi po:simp po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïmes/ aïr # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïtes/ aïr # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïrent/ aïr # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX fB haïr haïra/ aïr # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïrons/ aïr # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïrez/ aïr # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïront/ aïr # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX fB haïr haïrait/ aïr # po:cond po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïrions/ aïr # po:cond po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïriez/ aïr # po:cond po:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïraient/ aïr # po:cond po:3pl
SFX fB haïr haïsse/ aïr # po:spre po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïssons/ aïr # po:impe po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssez/ aïr # po:impe po:2pl

SFX fC Y 11
SFX fC partir partir/ impartir # po:infi
SFX fC partir partissant/ impartir # po:ppre
SFX fC partir parti/ impartir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX fC partir partis/ impartir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX fC partir partie/ impartir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX fC partir parties/ impartir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX fC partir partis/ impartir # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fC partir partit/ impartir # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX fC partir partissons/ impartir # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX fC partir partissez/ impartir # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX fC partir partissent/ impartir # po:ipre po:3pl!

SFX fD Y 12
SFX fD ortir ortir/ sortir # po:infi
SFX fD ortir ortissant/ sortir # po:ppre
SFX fD ortir ortit/ sortir # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX fD ortir ortissent/ sortir # po:ipre po:spre po:simp po:3pl
SFX fD ortir ortissait/ sortir # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX fD ortir ortissaient/ sortir # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX fD ortir ortira/ sortir # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX fD ortir ortiront/ sortir # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX fD ortir ortirait/ sortir # po:cond po:3sg
SFX fD ortir ortiraient/ sortir # po:cond po:3pl
SFX fD ortir ortisse/ sortir # po:spre po:3sg
SFX fD ortir ortît/ sortir # po:simp po:3sg
