st.dic
abêtir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
abonnir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
abréagir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
abrutir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
accourcir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
adoucir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
affaiblir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
affranchir/f0p+  # po:v2_itxq__a
agonir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
aguerrir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
aigrir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
alentir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
allotir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
alunir/f0p+  # po:v2_i_____a
amatir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
ameublir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
amoindrir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
amortir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
anoblir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
aplanir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
appauvrir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
applaudir/f0p+  # po:v2_itnq__a
approfondir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_x__a
assagir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
asservir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
assortir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
assouplir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
assouvir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
attendrir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
attiédir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
avertir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
avilir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
barrir/f0p.  # po:v2_i_____a
bénir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
blêmir/f0p+  # po:v2_i_____a
bleuir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
blottir/f0p+  # po:v2____p_e_
bouffir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
bruir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
calmir/f0p.  # po:v2_i_____a
catir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
chauvir/f0p.  # po:v2_i_____a
choisir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
compatir/f0p.  # po:v2_i_n___a
convertir/f0p+  # po:v2_itnq__a
crépir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
débâtir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
décatir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
décrudir/f0p+  # po:v1_it____a
défléchir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
défraichir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
dégarnir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
déglutir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
dégrossir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
déjaunir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
démolir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
dénantir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
dépolir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
dérougir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
désemplir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
désenlaidir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
désétablir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
désobéir/f0p.  # po:v2_i_n___a
dessertir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
déverdir/f0p.  # po:v2_it____a
divertir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
durcir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
ébaubir/f0p+  # po:v2____p_e_
éblouir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
écatir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
éclaircir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
effleurir/f0p.  # po:v2_i__q__a
élégir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
emboutir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
emplir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
enchérir/f0p+  # po:v2_i_____a
endurcir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
enfouir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
engourdir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
enlaidir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
enorgueillir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
ensevelir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
entrehaïr/fB  # po:v2____r_e_
envieillir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
épanouir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
équarrir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
estourbir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
étourdir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
évanouir/f0p+  # po:v2____p_e_
farcir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
fléchir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
fleurir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
fouir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
fournir/f0p+  # po:v2_itnq__a
fraîchir/f0p.  # po:v2_i_____a
frémir/f0p.  # po:v2_i_____a
fuir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_x__a
garnir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
gaudir/f0p+  # po:v2____p_e_
glapir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
grandir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
grossir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
haïr/fA  # po:v2_it_q__a
havir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
honnir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
impartir/fC  # po:v2__tn___a
infléchir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
interpeler/dA  # po:v1_it____a
intervertir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
investir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
jaunir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
languir/f0p+  # po:v2_i__q__a
matir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
moisir/f0p+  # po:v2_i_____a
mollir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
munir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
noircir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
obscurcir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
périr/f0p.  # po:v2_i_____a
pourrir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
prémunir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
rabougrir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
raffermir/f0p+  # po:v2__t_q__a
ragrandir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
ramollir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
rappointir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
réagir/f0p.  # po:v2_i_n___a
reblanchir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
reconvertir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
réfléchir/f0p+  # po:v2_itnq__a
regarnir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
rejaillir/f0p.  # po:v2_i_____a
remplir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
répartir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
resalir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
ressurgir/f0p.  # po:v2_i_____a
rétrécir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
reverdir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
rondir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
rouir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
saisir/f0p+  # po:v2_itxq__a
sertir/f0p+  # po:v2__t____a
sortir/fD  # po:v2__t___zz
superfinir/f0p+  # po:v2__t___zz
surinvestir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
tarir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
tiédir/f0p+  # po:v2_it____a
unir/f0p+  # po:v2__tnq__a
vieillir/f0p+  # po:v2_it_q__a
